South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4798.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 49, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-49-90.  (A) For purposes of state law, "recovery community organization" or "RCO" means an independent, nonprofit organization led and governed by individuals from the local community who have lived experience with substance use disorder recovery. (B) The purpose of an RCO is to mobilize resources, provide peer support, and advocate for public policy that increases the prevalence and quality of long-term recovery from substance use and behavioral health conditions. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----